Washington statutes.
RCW 43.43.110

Reinstatement on acquittal.

If as a result of any trial board hearing, or review proceeding, an officer complained of is found not guilty of the charges against him or her, he or she shall be immediately reinstated to his or her former position, and be reimbursed for any loss of salary suffered by reason of the previous disciplinary action.

[ 2009 c 549 s 5123; 1965 c 8 s 43.43.110. Prior: 1943 c 205 s 7; Rem. Supp. 1943 s 6362-72.]